source,title,url,published_raw,published_iso,snippet,text
kare11.com,Grow with KARE: Make a Bird Christmas Tree with foraged finds,https://www.kare11.com/article/life/home-garden/grow-with-kare/grow-with-kare-bird-christmas-tree/89-c3a1e7df-beff-4da5-9c64-1b3b72e9a4ac,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video GOLDEN VALLEY, Minn. — Nothing brings winter magic to a backyard quite like a Bird Christmas Tree. It’s festive, sustainable, and gives local birds a nutritious boost during the coldest months. Best of all, you can make one almost entirely from foraged materials and simple, pantry-friendly ingredients. Whether you dec","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
GOLDEN VALLEY, Minn. — Nothing brings winter magic to a backyard quite like a Bird Christmas Tree. It’s festive, sustainable, and gives local birds a nutritious boost during the coldest months.
Best of all, you can make one almost entirely from foraged materials and simple, pantry-friendly ingredients.
Whether you decorate an outdoor spruce, a potted evergreen, or a bare-branched tree in your yard, this project is a fun and meaningful way to welcome wildlife into your holiday celebrations.
You can use:
Make sure the tree is outside but visible from a window—so you can enjoy watching your winged guests.
Take a short walk around your garden, field edges, or woodland paths and keep an eye out for natural materials that birds appreciate. Some great finds include:
Seed Heads
Many native plants hold seeds long into winter. Look for:
Berries: Choose bird-safe berries such as:
Avoid berries that are toxic to birds—like holly, mistletoe, and yew.
Evergreen Sprigs and Pinecones
Pinecones will later become feeders, and evergreen sprigs add fullness and holiday charm.
Keep everything natural and unprocessed. Here are a few easy, bird-friendly “ornaments” you can make:
1. Oil-Free Popcorn Garlands
2. Pinecone Seed Treats
Gather large, open pinecones. Instead of peanut butter (which some prefer to avoid), you can use:
Tie with twine and hang.
3. Citrus Cup Feeders
Cut oranges in half, scoop out the fruit (birds may eat this too), and fill the rinds with birdseed or suet. Poke three small holes near the rim, tie with twine, and hang like a tiny ornament.
4. Fruit Garland or Clusters
Thread small apple slices or rose hips onto twine, or tie clusters of crabapples directly onto branches.
Now for the fun part—dressing your tree!
Aim for a mix of textures, colors, and food types to attract a variety of birds—chickadees, finches, cardinals, blue jays, and woodpeckers will all find something to love.
Check the tree every few days. Refill empty citrus cups, replace soggy treats after snow or rain, and add new foraged finds as the season progresses. You'll quickly discover which birds prefer which treats.
This project does more than brighten your outdoor space—it helps wildlife survive winter. Natural food sources become scarce as temperatures drop, and your tree offers energy-rich snacks right when birds need them most. It’s a beautiful blend of tradition, creativity, and stewardship."
kare11.com,Is fraud money from Minnesota funding a terror group?,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/crime/fraud-money-minnesota-funding-terror-group/89-eae57f17-9953-4621-aed5-433e6582ce32,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video MINNEAPOLIS — President Trump's decision to end Temporary Protected Status for Somalis in America is believed to be prompted by a viral article from a conservative activist. The article claims tax money stolen in fraud schemes - such as Feeding our Future - is funding the Somalia-based terror group Al-Shabaab. Former ","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
MINNEAPOLIS — President Trump's decision to end Temporary Protected Status for Somalis in America is believed to be prompted by a viral article from a conservative activist. The article claims tax money stolen in fraud schemes - such as Feeding our Future - is funding the Somalia-based terror group Al-Shabaab.
Former U.S. Attorney Andy Luger and lead prosecutor in the Feeding our Future case Joe Thompson have always said ""greed"" was the motivating factor for the defendants in the theft of $300 million in taxpayer dollars during the pandemic.
Now, an article in City Journal, an online conservative outlet, makes an even more consequential claim that millions of those dollars landed in the hands of terrorists.
""The Largest Funder of Al-Shabaab Is the Minnesota Taxpayer"" the headline reads.
But evidence that has come out in court shows that the vast majority of the millions sent overseas by the thieves has gone to Kenya -- not Somalia.
Several of the Somali-born defendants have family and connections in Kenya, where, notably, the money cannot be touched by the U.S. Government or the Somalia-based terror group.
But if any fraud money has been sent by defendants or their families to relatives in Somalia, an expert on Al-Shabaab says -- indirectly -- the terror group would receive a cut.
Former Counterterrorism Analyst at the U.S. State Department, Tricia Bacon, says Al-Shabaab taxes, or more accurately, extorts Somali people, which is how it funds itself.
""Nobody has to 'mean' to fund Al-Shabaab,"" Bacon said. ""But that's sort of the cost of doing business in Somalia because the government has been so ineffective at protecting people from Al-Shabaab's extortion that, you know, you don't really have a choice of whether or not to pay.""
The feds believe that some fraud money inevitably ended up back in Somalia -- but not nearly as much as the article states.
GOP lawmakers have asked U.S. Attorney Daniel Rosen to investigate.
Former U.S. Attorney Andy Luger told KARE 11 News that if there was any evidence of providing material support to a terrorist group, he definitely would have charged it, as he did in other cases while he was in that office."
kare11.com,KARE 11 Investigates: Company Billed Medicaid for Client It Never Met,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/investigations/kare-11-investigates-company-billed-medicaid-for-client-it-never-met/89-7203e012-9e12-4759-9982-00b73a1484d0,,,"KARE 11 investigates a company whose Medicaid billing skyrocketed nearly seventyfold in one year - including for a “client” who received no services. A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Steven Eckert, Gary Knox To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Play Video Close Video A New Life Who are Community Care Partners? Owner Acknowledges Fraud ""It's not all Right"" OAK GR","KARE 11 investigates a company whose Medicaid billing skyrocketed nearly seventyfold in one year - including for a “client” who received no services.
A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Steven Eckert, Gary Knox
To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Play Video
Close Video
A New Life
Who are Community Care Partners?
Owner Acknowledges Fraud
""It's not all Right""
OAK GROVE, Minn.
What started as a routine check of her Medicaid billing turned into a shocking discovery for Erna Hammerschmidt. The Minnesota woman had rebuilt her life after a prolonged battle with addiction, only to find her name being used to commit what she calls fraud.
“Well, it was weird,” said Erna, “I was looking at my claims and I saw this company called Community Care Partners in there and I was like - who are these people?”
The company she’d never heard of or met with was billing her Medicaid insurance, coverage provided through UCare, $188.90 multiple times a week, claiming to have provided Adult Rehabilitative Mental Health Services (ARMHS).
ARMHS is a program overseen by the embattled Minnesota Department of Human Services – already facing sharp criticism for failing to prevent widespread fraud in taxpayer-funded programs designed to help people battling addiction and homelessness.
The ARMHS program provides a range of services to help individuals develop and enhance psychiatric stability, social competencies, personal and emotional adjustment, and independent living and community skills.
“I’ve never received any type of ARMHS services.” Erna added, “This company, Community Care Partners, has never worked with me in any way shape or form.”
Erna now wakes to the sound of roosters. She soaks in the simple chores that come with rural life on the outskirts of Oak Grove, a city with a population of less than nine thousand people.
“A lot more calming and peaceful for the soul,” she said, “like no ambulances, no gun shooting, nothing like that.”
Erna spent 15 years battling active addiction. “I’ve been through a lot,” she said while walking through the backyard of the home she’s now renting, “And it’s nice to be able to say I have a place where I actually feel safe.”
Two years sober, she’s proud to be a success story of Minnesota’s publicly funded rehabilitation and Housing Stabilization Services (HSS) programs, which helped her find both stability and a home.
She’s watched with concern as KARE 11’s investigations exposed seemingly endless cases of alleged fraud in these programs that helped her throughout her recovery journey. The HSS program that found her a place to live was completely terminated last week , as the state decided they were unable to prevent fraud and could not afford to wait and see if legislative reforms and new program integrity measures would be effective.
After KARE 11’s initial investigations, there were law enforcement raids , federal fraud charges , and more than 100 businesses had their ability to bill Medicaid suspended or terminated.
Out of an abundance of caution, she decided to look over her own Medicaid insurance billing claims.
That’s how she spotted thousands of dollars billed by the mysterious company named Community Care Partners.
“Like, who are you? I don’t know who you are,” she recalled thinking.
She is not alone in questioning alleged ghost billing by ARMHS providers. KARE 11 recently exposed similar allegations of billing fraud involving another company called Action Therapy LLC. “They’re billing,” said Mohamed Ali who spotted thousands of dollars in charges on his Medicaid account, “never been there before, never even heard of it.”
Charge after charge, week after week, month after month. Erna’s Medicaid insurance had been billed repeatedly by Community Care Partners, supposedly for providing ARMHS.
Again, Erna said she’d never heard of the company – and never received services from them.
“Absolutely, I feel like fraud was committed,” she said. “There’s no way it wasn’t.”
She contacted KARE 11 Investigates.
To find out who was behind Community Care Partners, KARE 11 Investigates visited the St. Anthony office building listed on the company’s website.
Inside the building, at Suite 312, there were small signs taped to a door and mailbox with the company’s name - but no people. During regular business hours, no one answered the door.
Online, the company’s website looked equally hollow. A “Meet Our Team” page contained no actual names or photos - just a line reading, “Find us at our working location,” – the same office building address KARE visited in St. Anthony.
KARE 11 contacted the registered manager listed at the time on the Minnesota Secretary of State's website, who said she was no longer affiliated with the business and had sold it in December 2023. She provided KARE 11 with a copy of the sale records confirming Community Care Partners had been purchased for $60,000 by a group of three buyers: Hibat Sharif, Musab Abdulkadir, and Mohamed Mohamed.
EDITOR’S NOTE: After the original publication of this report, all three of the listed buyers contacted KARE 11 stating that Mohamed Mohamed is the sole owner of the company. They said that while Hibat Sharif and Musab Abdulkadir signed the initial purchase agreement, they did not complete it and never took ownership or had any legal, financial, or managerial responsibility for Community Care Partners.
After KARE 11's conversation with the prior owner, the Secretary of State's website was changed to reflect current company leadership.
The ownership change took place before the suspicious billings Erna discovered when she reviewed her insurance claims.
Records show her billings were part of a dramatic increase in the company’s overall Medicaid charges.
State Medicaid billing data, obtained by KARE 11 through an open records request, revealed that after the sale, the company immediately experienced explosive financial growth.
The billing data shows Community Care Partners charged the ARMHS program $20,000 in 2022 and $10,000 in 2023. But in 2024, after the sale, its billing skyrocketed nearly 7,000 percent - to more than $718,000.
In at least Erna Hammerschmidt’s case, it was tax dollars paid to a company for imaginary services.
“What you’re doing is not morally or ethically ok,” Erna said. “You can’t just bill people and make money off them and look at them like a paycheck.”
In an email, one of the new owners of Community Care Partners, Mohamed Mohamed, refused to meet for an interview – but confirmed there had been fraudulent billing.
He wrote that after learning of a client’s allegations, “We immediately conducted an internal review and, that same day, terminated the staff member involved.”
Mohamed added that the company notified “all appropriate authorities, including DHS,” and was working on repayment for what he called “an isolated incident.”
In all bold print, he also voiced concern about what he felt was unfair targeting of his business due to his ethnicity and religion.
“Given our clean compliance history, it is concerning that this isolated issue would prompt an investigation by local media. We cannot ignore the broader climate where Somali and Muslim owned Medicaid providers have been disproportionately scrutinized following recent fraud accusations elsewhere. We believe our actions demonstrate that we handled this situation responsibly, transparently, and in line with state and federal expectations.”
Mohamed did not respond to KARE 11’s follow-up email asking questions about the amount of money being refunded, the name of the employee fired, and which law enforcement agency the fraud was reported to.
KARE 11 submitted questions to DHS about whether Community Care Partners was under investigation and whether they were being allowed to continue billing the state’s Medicaid programs.
The Department did not directly answer the questions posed, but sent a statement saying in part:
“DHS is expanding its use of data analytics to look at trends and outliers in provider billing. A sudden increase in billing is something that warrants additional review. Further, DHS encourages providers to self-report billing errors or suspected fraud occurring within their own programs. In this instance, because the client at issue was enrolled with UCare, it is UCare’s responsibility to investigate and take action, such as recovering money, on this specific conduct.”
Shortly thereafter, Governor Tim Walz announced that in order to better catch fraud on the front end, 14 DHS run Medicaid programs will be subject to third-party billing audits before payments are issued. ARMHS is one of those programs.
For Erna, the experience feels deeply personal.
She believes legitimate government programs helped her recover from addiction and find stable housing. Now she wonders: Is unchecked fraud destroying the safety net desperately needed by other vulnerable Minnesotans?
“Services like this are going to end up so limited and nonexistent for people because of sh** like this,” Erna exclaimed, adding, “excuse my language.”
She rebuilt her life on the foundation of honesty, a cornerstone of recovery, only to find her name being used to commit fraud against taxpayers.
“Granted it’s not coming out of my own pocket,” she says. “But at the end of the day, it’s coming out of someone’s, and it’s not all right.”
This story is part of KARE 11’s ongoing “Recovery Inc.” series uncovering fraud in Minnesota’s Medicaid-funded addiction recovery, behavioral health, and housing programs. If you have information to help our reporters, contact the KARE 11 Investigates team at investigations@kare11.com"
kare11.com,KARE 11 Investigates: Evergreen Recovery CEO & CFO plead guilty in federal fraud case,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/investigations/kare-11-investigates-evergreen-recovery-ceo-pleads-guilty-in-federal-fraud-case/89-0cbdf6bc-c48e-4cf0-b873-9958c416f384,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video MINNEAPOLIS — Two of the top executives charged in the massive Evergreen Recovery Medicaid fraud case have become the first to plead guilty. Shantel Magadanz, Evergreen’s former chief executive officer (CEO), and Heather Heim (CFO) entered guilty pleas in federal court Tuesday to one count of conspiracy to commit wire","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
MINNEAPOLIS — Two of the top executives charged in the massive Evergreen Recovery Medicaid fraud case have become the first to plead guilty.
Shantel Magadanz, Evergreen’s former chief executive officer (CEO), and Heather Heim (CFO) entered guilty pleas in federal court Tuesday to one count of conspiracy to commit wire fraud, admitting as part of plea deals that they played a role in the multi-year scheme to overbill taxpayers for addiction treatment services that were often never provided, or not eligible for reimbursement.
The pleas marks the first convictions in the sprawling case that federal prosecutors say drained more than $30 million from government health-care programs meant to help Minnesotans struggling with addiction.
Magadanz and Heim were indicted in December 2024 following an ongoing KARE 11 Investigates series that exposed Evergreen’s questionable billing practices.
Owner Shawn Grygo was also charged.
KARE 11’s reporting documented Evergreen clients who said they were billed for treatment sessions they never attended, and former employees who described being ordered to falsify records.
In one striking example, Evergreen’s internal documents listed a man as attending a therapy group at the same time he was actually miles away committing a double-murder .
Federal prosecutors later alleged Evergreen staff held an all-night session to fabricate and back-date client records ahead of a state inspection, creating “hundreds” of fake entries to justify fraudulent billing. As part of their plea deals Magadanz and Heim both acknowledged taking part in the all-night record falsification session along with their boss, Shawn Grygo.
Assistant U.S. Attorney Joseph Thompson, who leads the Fraud and Public Corruption Section in Minnesota, said at the time of the indictments that the defendants “got rich through fraud, kickbacks, and overbilling.”
According to the indictment and subsequent court filings, the false billing funded private jet charters, luxury vehicles, country club memberships and millions of dollars in handbags and clothes from designers such as Louis Vuitton, Gucci and Hermes .
It also provided employees like Magadanz and Heim with what prosecutors called “excessive salaries.” KARE’s investigation detailed how Magadanz was paid $703,000 per year while lower-level employees often had paychecks bounce.
The federal charges detail how Evergreen offered clients free housing in affiliated sober homes - an illegal “kickback,” prosecutors said - to keep people enrolled in treatment programs whose names were used to generate inflated Medicaid claims.
Through tears, Magadanz admitted that she falsified records to justify billing Medicaid. She entered her guilty plea before U.S. District Judge Katherine Menendez Tuesday at the federal courthouse in Minneapolis. About the billing fraud, she told the judge, “I knew it was happening and did not stop it.”
Her sentencing guidelines call for a range of 21 to 27 months' imprisonment. Judge Menendez will determine the final sentence. Magadanz has already agreed to pay nearly $900,000 in restitution.
Read the plea agreement below or by clicking this link :
To resolve the case against her, CFO Heather Heim entered into a similar plea agreement with $335,000 in restitution owed.
Both former Evergreen executives declined to comment about their guilty pleas when approached by KARE 11 outside the courtroom.
Evergreen owner Shawn Grygo, who has maintained her innocence, still faces trial on multiple counts of wire fraud and money laundering. Her husband, David Backus, has not been charged but has been labled in the federal investigation ""a target...who participated in the scheme"".
Evergreen Recovery shut down after an FBI raid in July 2024, and its assets remain frozen by court order .
The case is part of a broader federal crackdown on Medicaid fraud in Minnesota, including the addiction recovery and housing stabilization programs – a wave of probes and prosecutions that began as KARE 11’s Recovery Inc. investigations exposed widespread abuse."
kare11.com,KARE 11 Investigates: First guilty plea in Minnesota Housing Services fraud probe,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/investigations/kare-11-investigates-first-guilty-plea-in-minnesota-housing-services-fraud/89-49128c62-a832-40ca-9605-ba3d6718bbd3,,,"Anwar Adow admits to fraudulently billing Housing Stabilization Services for Medicaid reimbursement. A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Gary Knox To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Play Video Close Video Finding the Fraud Admitting Guilt Other Players and The Playbook Repercussions ST PAUL, Minn. A Housing Stabilization Services (HSS) owner pleaded guilty in fed","Anwar Adow admits to fraudulently billing Housing Stabilization Services for Medicaid reimbursement.
A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Gary Knox
To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Play Video
Close Video
Finding the Fraud
Admitting Guilt
Other Players and The Playbook
Repercussions
ST PAUL, Minn.
A Housing Stabilization Services (HSS) owner pleaded guilty in federal court on Thursday, admitting that he used the taxpayer-funded program, intended to provide housing assistance to vulnerable individuals, to defraud Medicaid.
Anwar Adow, the 25-year-old owner of Liberty Plus LLC, entered a guilty plea to one count of wire fraud, acknowledging he carried out the scheme by inflating service hours provided by his company to collect Medicaid dollars. In total, Liberty Plus LLC fraudulently obtained more than $1.2 million according to the plea deal filed in federal court.
The conviction marks the latest development in KARE 11's Housing Hustle Investigation , which has exposed allegations of fraud within the over $100 million-a-year housing program.
Through a series of reports , KARE's investigation analyzed Medicaid billing data and client records to reveal systemic problems in the program. Designed to help elderly and disabled Minnesotans find and maintain housing, the Medicaid-funded program instead showed signs of widespread fraud - ranging from services billed but not provided to forged client signatures .
KARE 11's Investigation of Liberty Plus LLC revealed that the company's website, which solicits clients for HSS, is built entirely from stock images, and its “Meet Our Team” page lists “Caregiver Name” as placeholders instead of real employees.
Kare 11 also uncovered clients who were promised help finding housing by Liberty Plus. That help never came despite their name being used to bill Medicaid.
Julie Quiroz was homeless when she told KARE 11, she responded to an advertisement for Liberty Plus posted in a Holiday gas station bathroom.
She said the man she spoke to on the phone with Liberty Plus promised to help her find housing, but then provided virtually no follow-up. Julie and her dog spent that winter barely surviving, living out of her car. She also accused the company of forging her name on documents, which allowed them to bill Medicaid.
In court Thursday, Adow admitted he instructed Liberty Plus LLC employees to bill as much as they could and “made clear to those employees that he would not scrutinize the purported billable hours,"" to receive more funds.
Sources tell KARE 11, Adow “weaponized incompetence” to target the state’s program.
Adow also admitted to diverting his company's funds to its employees, luxury purchases, a leased 2023 Mercedes-Benz, and his brother, Asad Adow, who also faces charges in the fraud investigation for his company, Leo Human Services .  According to state data, Leo Human Services received more than $2.7 million in Medicaid dollars.
The plea deal also reveals new details about the joint federal and state raid on the Blaine home where the brothers lived. According to the court filing, more than $88,000 in cash was seized during the raid, some of it found under a mattress and hidden in a suitcase beneath the stairs.
In Anwar Adow's bedroom, investigators found $48,600 in cash. In his brother Asad's bedroom, $14,760 was seized from a safe, and another $25,000 was discovered in a suitcase in the closet under the stairs. Per the court filing, Anwar acknowledged the currency was subject to forfeiture because it was traceable to the wire fraud scheme.
The Adow brothers and six other individuals tied to HSS companies were federally charged with wire fraud in September. Court filings indicate in November Asad Adow will also plead guilty to the fraud charges.
Moktar Aden, Mustafa Ali, Khalid Dayib, and Abdifatah Mohamed were charged for their alleged role in committing fraud tied to intertwined HSS companies: Brilliant Minds Services and Foundation First Services . The companies reportedly received more than $2 million in Medicaid dollars between September 2022 and April 2025.
Christopher Falade and Emmanuel Falade, with Faladcare Inc., were also charged with fraud. The company reportedly received more than $2 million in Medicaid funds.
""Fraud has overtaken legitimate services,"" Acting U.S. Attorney Joseph Thompson said during a September press conference. ""The level of fraud in these programs is staggering. Unfortunately, our system of trust, but verify, no longer works.""
Thompson said the scheme used by all five businesses was the same: The companies would identify vulnerable individuals leaving drug or mental health rehab programs and sign them up for housing stabilization services. The companies would then bill Medicaid for services that were never provided, and most clients received little to none of the assistance they desperately needed.
Anwar Adow could face between 41-51 months in prison, per federal guidelines. A sentencing date has not yet been set.
The crackdown on fraud within Minnesota's Medicaid-funded programs is far from over. The U.S. Attorney’s Office for the District of Minnesota has maintained that further arrests and charges are expected in the coming months. To date, 115 individual HSS businesses have been banned from billing Medicaid due to what the state labels credible allegations of fraud. The entire program is slated to end on October 31st."
kare11.com,KARE 11 Investigates: Fraud was Family Affair — second guilty plea in Minnesota Housing Services fraud probe,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/investigations/kare-11-investigates-fraud-was-family-affair-second-guilty-plea-in-minnesota-housing-services-fraud-probe/89-7efdbf14-00a7-44e7-843b-b9d92bcd10ef,,,"Asad Adow admitted to fraudulently billing Housing Stabilization Services for millions in Medicaid reimbursement. A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Steven Eckert, Gary Knox To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Play Video Close Video Finding the Fraud Admitting Guilt Other HSS Fraud Charges Consequences of Fraud ST PAUL, Minn. A Housing Stabilization Services (HSS","Asad Adow admitted to fraudulently billing Housing Stabilization Services for millions in Medicaid reimbursement.
A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Steven Eckert, Gary Knox
To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Play Video
Close Video
Finding the Fraud
Admitting Guilt
Other HSS Fraud Charges
Consequences of Fraud
ST PAUL, Minn.
A Housing Stabilization Services (HSS) company owner pleaded guilty in federal court on Monday, admitting that he used the taxpayer-funded program - intended to provide housing assistance to vulnerable individuals - to defraud Medicaid.
Asad Adow, the 26-year-old owner of Leo Human Services LLC, pleaded guilty to one count of wire fraud, acknowledging he knowingly submitted false billing claims for services his company never provided in order to collect Medicaid funds.
Leo Human Services LLC billed more than $2.7 million, according to state data.
Asad is the second defendant to enter a guilty plea in the federal fraud probe. The first was Asad's brother, Anwar, who ran another HSS company called Liberty Plus LLC. The conviction marks the latest development in KARE 11's Housing Hustle Investigation , which exposed rampant fraud within the more than $100 million-a-year housing program.
In a series of reports , KARE's investigation analyzed Medicaid billing data and client records to reveal systemic problems in the program. Designed to help elderly and disabled Minnesotans find and maintain housing, the Medicaid-funded program instead showed signs of widespread fraud - ranging from services billed but not provided to forged client signatures .
KARE 11's Investigation of Leo Human Services LLC uncovered clients who accused the company of billing their insurance for services they knew nothing about and forging their signatures .
One client, Steven Smith, said he never met with the company and never signed any documents. However, Leo Human Services records had Steven's signature forged on housing consultation documents.
""I did not sign this legal document,"" he said, pointing out inaccuracies that included the document listing his name incorrectly as ""Steven Jr Smith.""
“Why would I say that I’m Steven Jr Smith?” He asked. “My middle name is actually Steven Dwayne Smith.”
KARE 11 extracted metadata from the PDF document, which revealed that Smith’s signature, dated 08/28/23, was actually created the following day, 08/29/23, and authored by someone using the name Wats Hanin.
Leo Human Services LLC claimed to help support approximately 250 Minnesotans in finding and maintaining housing, but the facts laid out by federal prosecutors tell a different story.
In court Monday, Asad Adow admitted he instructed his employees to bill as much as they could and “made clear to those employees that he would not scrutinize the purported billable hours."" According to federal prosecutors, this inflated the company's billing, allowing Medicaid reimbursements for ""far greater services than actually provided.""
The Leo Human Services owner also admitted he submitted false provider notes to back-up the fraudulent claims.
Asad then acknowledged he diverted company funds to co-conspirators, made luxury purchases that included a leased 2024 BMW X4 crossover, and real estate investments in Kenya.
The Adow brothers operated their businesses, in part, out of the same Baine home where they also lived. When raided by state and federal agents , nearly $100,000 in cash was seized, according to court filings.
In Asad's bedroom, $14,760 was seized from a safe, and another $25,000 was discovered in a suitcase in the closet under the stairs. In his brother Anwar's bedroom, investigators found $48,600 in cash, some of it hidden under a mattress. In federal court, Asad acknowledged the currency was subject to forfeiture because it was traceable to the wire fraud scheme.
The Adow brothers and six other individuals tied to HSS companies were federally charged with wire fraud in September.
Moktar Aden, Mustafa Ali, Khalid Dayib, and Abdifatah Mohamed were charged for their alleged roles in committing fraud tied to a pair of intertwined HSS companies: Brilliant Minds Services and Foundation First Services . The companies reportedly received more than $2 million in Medicaid dollars between September 2022 and April 2025.
Christopher Falade and Emmanuel Falade, with Faladcare Inc., were also charged with fraud. The company reportedly received more than $2 million in Medicaid funds.
""Fraud has overtaken legitimate services,"" Acting U.S. Attorney Joseph Thompson said during a September press conference. ""The level of fraud in these programs is staggering. Unfortunately, our system of trust, but verify, no longer works.""
Thompson said the scheme used by all five businesses was the same. The companies would identify vulnerable individuals leaving drug or mental health rehab programs and sign them up for housing stabilization services. The companies would then bill Medicaid for services that were never provided, and most clients received little to no assistance, support they desperately needed.
Asad could face between 51 and 63 months in prison, according to federal guidelines. A sentencing date has not yet been set. He's also agreed to pay approximately $2,710,000 in restitution as part of his plea deal.
Asad did not comment when approached outside of court by KARE 11.
The crackdown on fraud within Minnesota's Medicaid-funded programs is far from over. The U.S. Attorney’s Office for the District of Minnesota has maintained that further arrests and charges are expected in the coming months.
To date, 115 individual HSS businesses have been banned from billing Medicaid due to what the state labels credible allegations of fraud. In October, the state officially terminated Minnesota’s entire Housing Stabilization Services (HSS) program , with the goal of revamping and rebuilding the program to include stronger fraud prevention and oversight."
kare11.com,KARE 11 Investigates: MN Governor appoints new fraud czar,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/investigations/kare-11-investigates-mn-governor-appoints-new-fraud-czar/89-640f1eb9-728d-45de-b8f5-07bd2e7fae88,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video ST PAUL, Minn. — Minnesota is creating a new top-level fraud watchdog, a move aimed at curbing widespread abuse of taxpayer-funded programs. At the Capitol Friday, Gov. Tim Walz announced the appointment of Judge Tim O’Malley as the state’s new Director of Program Integrity. The role is designed to oversee fraud preve","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
ST PAUL, Minn. — Minnesota is creating a new top-level fraud watchdog, a move aimed at curbing widespread abuse of taxpayer-funded programs.
At the Capitol Friday, Gov. Tim Walz announced the appointment of Judge Tim O’Malley as the state’s new Director of Program Integrity. The role is designed to oversee fraud prevention efforts across state agencies - including Medicaid programs that have been plagued by extensive abuse. He will be based out of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension (BCA).
O’Malley, currently serving as Interim Chief Judge of the Minnesota Court of Administrative Hearings, brings decades of law enforcement and legal experience to the newly created role. His career began as a Rochester police officer in 1977, followed by service with the FBI - including time as a SWAT team member and sniper - and leadership roles at the Minnesota Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, where he later served as superintendent under Republican Governor Tim Pawlenty from 2006 - 2010.
""While I’m honored that Gov Walz has asked me to assist in combatting fraud here,"" O'Malley said, ""know that I’m not here to serve him, I’m not here to serve any individual and I’m not here to serve a political party. I’m here to serve Minnesotans.""
It's not O’Malley’s first time stepping into a high-profile scandal that’s caused the erosion of public trust. In 2014, he was brought in by the Archdiocese of St. Paul and Minneapolis to respond to allegations of sexual misconduct and abuse by clergy .
O'Malley told reporters the problem of fraud must be addressed to restore trust.
""No one has any tolerance for fraud,"" he said. ""It's a widespread problem in Minnesota and across our country. It erodes trust and must be addressed head-on."" He added, ""Minnesotans deserve to know that their tax dollars are being put to good use, and they deserve to know that they can trust our public institutions.""
Today’s announcement by Governor Walz comes amid a steady drumbeat of headlines nationally about Minnesota’s failure to prevent fraud.
Last week, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS) threatened the Walz administration it would withhold federal payments unless the state took stronger action to address fraud vulnerabilities in its Medicaid programs.
In addition to the appointment of O’Malley, Governor Walz also announced the state will contract with WayPoint, Inc., a Minnesota-based firm specializing in forensic accounting and financial investigations, to help design and implement a statewide fraud-prevention program.
""We are a state that chooses not to let people go hungry or homeless or uneducated; however, that generosity has been taken advantage of by an organized group of fraudsters and criminals,"" Walz said.
For years, KARE 11’s investigations have documented systemic failures inside state-funded social service programs - particularly within Medicaid - where weak oversight allowed bad actors to exploit programs designed to help people struggling with addiction , homelessness , and disabilities .
KARE’s “Housing Hustle” investigation exposed massive, organized fraud schemes within Minnesota’s Housing Stabilization Services (HSS) program - a Medicaid-funded safety net meant to help people with disabilities and those facing homelessness find and keep housing .
KARE’s reporting uncovered forged documents, falsified service notes, kickbacks, and criminal networks of fly-by-night companies siphoning what federal prosecutors now believe to be hundreds of millions of dollars for housing help never provided, including for clients who were already dead , all while state regulators repeatedly failed to act.
Minnesota's top Republicans weighed in on Walz's plan Friday, as House Speaker Lisa Demuth (R-Cold Spring) called it ""too little, too late.""
""The time for program integrity was years ago - now it’s time for accountability,” she said in a statement.
GOP Floor Leader Rep. Harry Niska (R-Ramsey) echoed Demuth, accusing the governor of ""trying to save face.""
""To be clear, creating a new layer of bureaucracy inside the same failed administration that did nothing to stop fraud in the first place is not reform, it's self-protection."" Niska said.
Whether the new position and measures will be able to rein in fraud across Minnesota’s sprawling social service system and restore confidence in programs meant to serve the most vulnerable remains an open question.
DHS Acting Commissioner Shireen Ghandi said Friday that her agency currently has 1,300 open fraud investigations.
""It’s pretty obvious: Fraud happened, we need to take accountability – ultimately, me,"" Walz said."
kare11.com,KARE 11 Investigates: Pausing all payments to catch fraud on the front end,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/investigations/kare-11-investigates-pausing-all-payments-to-catch-fraud-on-the-front-end/89-cefb1929-76c0-4218-b2b5-bd75ea7188f7,,,"Governor Walz announces third-party billing audit for 14 high-risk Medicaid programs. A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Gary Knox To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Play Video Close Video Audits First, Payments Later Shutting off the Spigot Officials React ST PAUL, Minn. Fourteen Minnesota human services programs will now face third-party billing audits before ","Governor Walz announces third-party billing audit for 14 high-risk Medicaid programs.
A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Gary Knox
To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Play Video
Close Video
Audits First, Payments Later
Shutting off the Spigot
Officials React
ST PAUL, Minn.
Fourteen Minnesota human services programs will now face third-party billing audits before receiving Medicaid payments. The move, announced by Governor Tim Walz on Wednesday, is designed to better catch fraud on the front end and scrutinize the use of public funds.
The announcement comes in the wake of KARE 11's investigations that exposed widespread Medicaid billing abuse. The governor says the move is designed to “pump the brakes” and rebuild public trust in safety net programs meant to help Minnesota’s most vulnerable and disadvantaged residents.
In addition, the state has officially received federal approval for Minnesota’s Housing Stabilization Services (HSS) program to be terminated. A spokesperson for DHS confirmed to KARE 11 that the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services has approved its request to terminate the HSS program amid allegations of widespread fraud. The program's last day is this Friday, Oct. 31.
The announcements follow Housing Hustle, a series of in-depth reports by KARE 11 Investigates that exposed questionable billing practices within state programs, and clients' claims that billed services were not being provided.
According to the governor's office, payments to affected programs will be paused for up to 90 days to detect suspicious billing activity.
Using $2.3 million approved during the 2025 legislative session, Minnesota’s Department of Human Services (DHS) hired Optum, a third-party contractor based in Eden Prairie, to help spot potential fraud before taxpayer money is spent. The company will flag questionable activity such as missing documentation, unusually high billing, and other irregularities. However, the audit will only apply to fee-for-service claims, cases in which a provider is paid directly by DHS. It won't apply to Medicaid dollars paid out through Managed Care Organizations (MCO).
“We cannot effectively deliver programs and services if they don’t have the backing of the public’s trust. In order to restore that trust, we are pumping the brakes on 14 programs that were created to help the most disadvantaged among us, yet have become the target of criminal activity,” said Governor Walz in a press release.
“If you attempt to defraud our public programs and steal taxpayer dollars out from under the people who need them most – you will be stopped, and you will be held accountable.”
The Human Services Department designated the following 14 Medicaid services as high-risk, based on program vulnerabilities, evidence of fraudulent activity, and other suspicious patterns:
During a virtual press conference Wednesday, DHS Inspector General James Clark explained how technology is playing a larger role than ever in detecting fraud.
""This moves our fraud detection efforts in an enhanced fashion upstream, so we're not paying and chasing,"" he said. “You will need to prove to us that you provided legitimate services before we pay you.”
KARE 11 Investigates has spotlighted fraud in many of Minnesota's service programs as part of its years-long Recovery Inc.  investigation , including Peer Recovery Services, ARMHS and HSS .
In August, DHS announced plans to terminate its $100-million-per-year HSS program, following an internal analysis by the DHS Office of Inspector General (OIG), which found that the program lacked sufficient safeguards, enabling fraudulent actors to siphon off funds intended for vulnerable Minnesotans.
""It was a difficult decision, but necessary to protect the integrity of Minnesota's Medicaid program,"" temporary Human Services Commissioner Shireen Gandhi said, addressing reporters during the virtual press conference.
The HSS program will officially close out on Friday.
Approximately 1,600 HSS providers will be affected by the shutdown; however, DHS has announced plans to to redesign and relaunch the program to include stronger fraud prevention mechanisms, higher standards for provider eligibility, and greater oversight and accountability.
“We’re taking a systematic approach to finding and stopping fraud,” said Gandhi, regarding Wednesday's announcement to pause billing in the 13 other programs.
“Adding outside review before payments go out and increasing safeguards for these high-risk services will preserve resources necessary to serve Minnesota’s children, people with disabilities and older adults.”
Politicians on both sides of the aisle have reacted to the Governor's latest fraud prevention measure.
Senate Majority Leader Erin Murphy (DFL- St. Paul) applauded what she believes is a proactive safeguard by the Walz administration.
""Governor Walz's decisive actions today to further crack down on fraud shows he is not just talking about fraud, he is acting to stop it before it happens. Fraud schemes are more sophisticated and organized than ever, and the third-party audit announced today will provide enhanced tools for Minnesota to tackle fraud,"" the Senate Majority Leader said. ""New leadership at the Department of Human Services, using policy tools created by legislative Democrats is uncovering and stopping fraud. The continued leadership of Senator Heather Gustafson to establish an independent office of Inspector General will strengthen the work to prevent, detect, and halt theft in important programs serving vulnerable Minnesotans.""
However, some House Republicans criticized fraud under the administration's watch, calling for more legislative change next session.
“It is shocking to learn that the Walz Administration has only now identified 14 programs as high risk for Medicaid fraud. Minnesotans have watched scandal after scandal unfold under Governor Walz, but the fact that there are more than a dozen programs under suspicion proves that Walz’s fraud crisis is far worse, and far more widespread, than anyone was led to believe by the administration,"" Speaker Lisa Demuth (R-Cold Spring) and House Republican Floor Leader Harry Niska (R-Ramsey) said. “Independent audits are essential to uncovering and stopping fraud in Minnesota, and while it’s encouraging to see another tool being utilized to combat the explosion of fraud on Walz’s watch, we still must pass legislation next session to create a Legislative Office of the Inspector General to deliver real accountability and transparency in state government.”
State Rep. Kristin Robbins (R-Maple Grove), who chairs the Fraud Prevention and State Agency Oversight Policy Committee and is running for Governor, urged Walz to make the audit findings public and renewed calls for the creation of an independent Office of Inspector General.
""I am glad to see Governor Walz is finally taking action to audit these programs after years of ignoring credible allegations of fraud. I called for a full federal audit months ago and am glad he has decided to take this seriously,"" she said. ""I look forward to a full public report of the audit results, as well as transparency on how the auditor was selected and how much they are being paid to perform this work. It is long past time for an independent audit of DHS, and I hope the Governor will join us in creating an independent Office of Inspector General in the Executive branch, so independent oversight of executive branch agencies becomes routine.""
KARE 11 will update this report.
Watch the full DHS press conference below or at this link :"
kare11.com,KARE 11 Investigates: Death raises new fraud allegations in Minnesota’s Medicaid-funded ICS program,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/investigations/kare-11-investigates-unattended-death-raises-new-fraud-allegations-minnesota-medicaid-funded-ics-program/89-61240443-b8c1-4a60-969b-0b601c5fbd5d,,,"As costs soar and audits expand, one mother says her son’s death reveals the real-world price of neglect and alleged fraud. A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Steven Eckert, Gary Knox To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Play Video Close Video The Promise of Independence and Support The Provider and the Paper Trail Hard to Find, Harder to Reach Exploding Cost, Car","As costs soar and audits expand, one mother says her son’s death reveals the real-world price of neglect and alleged fraud.
A.J. Lagoe, Kelly Dietz, Steven Eckert, Gary Knox
To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Play Video
Close Video
The Promise of Independence and Support
The Provider and the Paper Trail
Hard to Find, Harder to Reach
Exploding Cost, Care Denied
""These Vulnerable People Need Help""
ST PAUL, Minn.
In an Eastside St. Paul apartment, 39-year-old Rick Clemmer was found dead on March 7, 2025. Police body-camera video from the scene captures a paramedic stating, “He’s got rigor and lividity - so he’s been deceased for a long amount of time.”
Clemmer’s death was ruled natural. The medical examiner cited an enlarged heart, but his mother, Mickey Clemmer, believes what’s written on the autopsy report tells only part of the story.
“If they were really providing him the services they should have been,” she told KARE 11, “he would be here with me.”
Rick battled serious mental illness for most of his adult life and struggled with addiction when off his court-ordered medication.
His past included civil commitments, incarceration, and living in supervised settings such as group homes. His family says he’d never lived on his own.
That changed in the summer of 2024, when he moved into his own apartment supported by a Medicaid-funded program called Integrated Community Supports or ICS.
Overseen by the Minnesota Department of Human Services (DHS), ICS is designed to help adults with disabilities live independently with daily one-to-one assistance - help with health, safety, and household tasks so people can maintain stability and independence in their own homes and communities.
For that individualized support, private ICS companies can bill hundreds of dollars a day.
But for Rick, “that’s where I think things went downhill,” his mom said.
Records obtained by KARE 11 show Rick’s ICS provider, Ultimate Home Health Services LLC, billed taxpayers $461.94 every single day, claiming to provide, on average, 12 hours of service daily.
“Fraud,” Mickey said bluntly. “They’re billing for something that never happened.”
She says she visited weekly, usually spending whole days at his apartment. “I can definitely confirm that those days there was nobody there,” she said, “I was there; there was nobody there.”
When Rick was found dead, St. Paul Police questioned an employee of Ultimate Home Health Services at the scene, his answers sharply undercut the company’s Medicaid billing:
Officer Rodriguez: When is the last time you guys know, seen him, or known that he was alive?
Abdul Ibrahim : Yesterday.
Officer Rodriguez: Around what time?
Abdul Ibrahim: It was yesterday morning…He is the most, one of the most independent, you know, residents here. So, we don’t got to do that much checking on him.
When asked if Rick was currently using drugs, the ICS worker responded, “I mean, to be honest, I do my daily check-ins, I have no idea what he does.”
That once-a-day “check-in” stands in stark contrast to the 12 hours of one-to-one care Ultimate Home claimed to provide each day.
Mickey believes if Ultimate Home Health Services had actually been seeing her son one-to-one for multiple hours every day (as they claimed), they could have called an ambulance in time to save him during a medical emergency.
Ibrahim did not respond to KARE 11’s multiple interview requests.
Ultimate Home Health Services’ bare-bones webpage appears to still be in development with just placeholder text and images: the “Contact Us” button doesn’t work, and its address reads simply “Main Street, Anytown, MN.”
The business’s physical location, Minnesota Secretary of State records show, is a small suite in the back of a Bloomington strip mall - locked and empty when KARE 11 visited during business hours.
The listed manager is Othman Mohamed, who has multiple healthcare-related businesses registered in his name. Mohamed’s LinkedIn says he’s also a registered nurse working full-time at Hennepin Healthcare.
No one from Ultimate Home Health Services responded to KARE 11’s numerous interview requests to discuss the allegations of fraud.
According to DHS payment data reviewed by KARE 11, Ultimate Home Health Services billed the ICS program for the first time in 2024 and was paid more than $421,000 that year. 2025 data is not yet available.
Federal prosecutor Joe Thompson recently cited concerns about the ICS program while announcing indictments tied to KARE 11’s earlier fraud exposés of fly-by-night companies plundering the state’s Medicaid system.
“The level of fraud in these programs is staggering,” Thompson said.
KARE 11’s analysis of state billing data revealed a staggering explosion in ICS program growth. ICS spending grew from $26 million in 2022 to $168 million by 2024 - a six-fold increase in just two years.
In September, an ICS client named Cain Pence walked with his cane into a Capitol fraud hearing and offered blistering testimony of how he was being denied ICS services by his provider while taxpayers footed the bill. “$276 a day in my case and they don’t do jack,” he said, his voice rising in frustration. “They do nothing!”
He accused DHS of ignoring his repeated phone calls and, “Not doing a damn thing.”
Just weeks later, DHS told the Legislature it had suspended payments to 11 ICS providers due to credible allegations of fraud. The fraud allegations uncovered, according to DHS, primarily involved ICS providers billing for services that were not provided.
DHS now tells KARE 11, the number of ICS providers suspended has jumped to 17.
Editor’s Note : After the initial publication of this report, DHS informed KARE 11 they have suspended payment to Ultimate Home Health Services LLC. It does not go into effect until December 2nd in order to create a safe transition period for current clients. The Department issued the following statement:
“DHS issued a payment withhold to Ultimate Home Health Services LLC because our investigation uncovered credible allegations of fraud involving the provider billing DHS for services that were not provided. We are working with county case managers so they can ensure continuity of care for impacted clients. We promptly followed up on reports that we received about Ultimate Home Health, investigated and decided to shut off the money. When we suspect fraud, we refer providers to law enforcement.”
In October, Governor Tim Walz ordered third-party pre-payment billing audits for 14 “high-risk” Medicaid programs - ICS among them.
For Mickey Clemmer, those policy moves come too late.
Rick’s case, she believes, is the human cost of alleged fraud in a system designed to support the vulnerable, which instead left her son to die alone.
“These vulnerable people need help,” she said. “You’re billing for them - then give them the help. And if you’re not, that’s fraud.”
KARE 11’s investigation into Medicaid-funded programs including Housing Stabilization Services (HSS), Adult Rehabilitative Mental Health Services (ARMHS), and Integrated Community Supports (ICS) - continues. If you have information to help our reporters, contact KARE 11 Investigates at investigations@kare11.com."
kare11.com,Ex-Minneapolis Chamber CEO pleads guilty in embezzlement case,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/local/courts-news/ex-minneapolis-chamber-ceo-pleads-guilty-embezzlement-case/89-cac1e6b2-cc79-4dc5-85d1-ef9e6e7ff00d,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video SAINT PAUL, Minn. — The man once at the helm of the Minneapolis Regional Chamber of Commerce now admits to his role in an embezzling scheme that ultimately funded a lavish lifestyle. Perhaps symbolically, the count the feds made Jonathan Weinhagen plead guilty to in this plea deal was mail fraud — the charge correspon","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
SAINT PAUL, Minn. — The man once at the helm of the Minneapolis Regional Chamber of Commerce now admits to his role in an embezzling scheme that ultimately funded a lavish lifestyle.
Perhaps symbolically, the count the feds made Jonathan Weinhagen plead guilty to in this plea deal was mail fraud — the charge corresponding with the money he stole that was supposed to help solve the high-profile shootings of three Minneapolis children. But he will be held accountable for more than $213,000 worth of theft.
The former Chamber CEO pleaded guilty to mail fraud to bring a quick end to his embezzlement case charged in late October.
In 2021, Weinhagen stood alongside family members of three child victims of shootings in Minneapolis.
""The business community has rallied together to create a $30,000 fund, a reward of up to $10,000 per case for information leading to the arrests of these individuals,"" Weinhagen said at a press conference with Mayor Jacob Frey.
Now, Weinhagen admits he stole that $30,000 donation given to Crime Stoppers by the Minneapolis Regional Chamber of Commerce.
""I feel like that's one of the lowest things that you can do,"" said one of the victims' grandfathers, KG Wilson. His 6-year-old granddaughter Aniya Allen was shot and killed while eating a Happy Meal in the back seat of her family's car in 2021. No one has been arrested in connection with her death.
""You'd have to be in a place of greed that takes you to a place of being heartless for you to take this type of money, any of it, but especially this money that was for innocent children who were murdered,"" Wilson said. ""What if this was your child or your grandchild? And you were hurting and torn to shreds. This had changed your life, and you were trying to get justice for your child or your grandchild, and you looked up on the news or got a call that somebody had did this, how would you feel? Would you want somebody to do this to you or your family?""
Weinhagen was a visible advocate for the Minneapolis business community, especially encouraging people to return downtown after the COVID-19 pandemic. But while serving in that role, Weinhagen admits he stole more than $213,000 by funneling money to a phony business he made up called Synergy Partners.
When others in the Chamber grew suspicious, Weinhagen told them that the company's owner, James Sullivan, died. But that was not a real person either. Weinhagen created a phony obituary to make the lie seem convincing.
Weinhagen used the money to fund his lifestyle, including expensive vacations.
Also during Weinhagen's plea hearing at the Saint Paul Federal Courthouse, Weinhagen admitted to a political aspect to his fraud. In 2021, he solicited $60,000 in donations from two businesses, intended for All of Minneapolis , a political action committee that supports Mayor Jacob Frey, of whom Weinhagen was a close ally. But he admits he stole that money as well.
Weinhagen will be sentenced at a later date. The sentencing guidelines call for between two and three years in prison.
In a statement to KARE 11, current Chamber CEO and President Mike Logan wrote:
""On behalf of its members, the Minneapolis Regional Chamber commends the work of the Department of Justice to hold Jonathan Weignhagen accountable. His actions were a profound breach of trust and caused significant harm to the organization from which we are still recovering.
Over the past 18 months, the MRC has taken decisive action to restore trust and strengthen the integrity of our organization.
As we move forward, we are more focused than ever on our core mission: forging partnerships that unite and grow member businesses and advance the vitality of the Greater MSP region."""
kare11.com,Hennepin County Judge tosses out jury's guilty verdict in $7.2 million home healthcare fraud case,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/local/courts-news/hennepin-county-judge-tosses-out-jurys-guilty-verdict-in-72-million-home-healthcare-fraud-case/89-cbbdfb26-eb5d-40cc-8a19-a17c8602c8bf,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video MINNEAPOLIS — At the August trial for Abdifatah Yusuf, the jury heard evidence that he ran his home healthcare company, Promise Health, out of a mailbox at a Central Avenue address where multiple other home healthcare companies were supposedly located. Yusuf and his wife Lul Ahmed were charged with stealing $7.2 milli","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
MINNEAPOLIS — At the August trial for Abdifatah Yusuf, the jury heard evidence that he ran his home healthcare company, Promise Health, out of a mailbox at a Central Avenue address where multiple other home healthcare companies were supposedly located.
Yusuf and his wife Lul Ahmed were charged with stealing $7.2 million of taxpayer money through Medicaid overbilling in a personal care assistant (PCA) scam.
The couple allegedly spent tens of thousands of the fraud money on luxury items for themselves.
""It was not a difficult decision whatsoever. The deliberation took probably four hours at most.  Based off of the state's evidence that was presented, it was beyond a reasonable doubt,"" jury foreperson Ben Walfoort told KARE 11 News.
Despite the jury swiftly convicting Yusuf, Judge Sarah West last week decided that they got it wrong, overturning the verdict and issuing a judgment of acquittal.
Defense attorney Joe Tamburino, who is not affiliated with the case, reviewed the decision and analyzed it for KARE 11 News. He says Judge West ruled that the state's case ""relied heavily on circumstantial evidence,"" and that she believed the state didn't rule out other ""reasonable inferences.""
""That in fact, there could have been other reasonable theories other than guilt in this case. That's what it comes down to,"" Tamburino said.
Despite the ruling, even Judge West wrote that she is ""troubled by the manner in which fraud was able to be perpetuated at Promise Health.""
State Rep. Kristin Robbins, chair of the House Fraud Prevention and State Oversight Committee, says she's now reviewing if any state laws need to be tightened.
""I was stunned. We want to strengthen state law so that we can get prosecutions out of these cases. Because clearly a jury thought he was guilty,"" Robbins said.
Jurors from the case can't believe the decision.
""I am shocked. I'm shocked based off of all of the evidence that was presented to us and the obvious guilt that we saw based off of the said evidence,"" Walfoort said.
Another juror told KARE 11: ""We didn't take our job lightly. We went through a lot of evidence and discussed a lot, took our time, but we all came to an agreement pretty easily.""
The Attorney General's Office filed an appeal on Monday. Prosecutors are rarely able to appeal an acquittal, but they can in this case since the judgment overturns the will of the jury.
Yusuf's attorney Ian Birrell provided KARE 11 with this statement: ""Judge West's ruling affirms what we have maintained from the beginning: our client Mr. Yusuf was wrongfully accused and did not commit fraud or racketeering. The Court's decision to enter judgments of acquittal on all charges reflects the fundamental principle that justice requires both fairness and proof. We appreciate the Court's careful attention to the evidence and the law."""
kare11.com,Federal Medicaid payments to Minnesota threatened over fraud,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/local/federal-medicaid-payments-to-minnesota-threatened-over-fraud/89-89f9fc12-fe8e-4abd-9264-579b68cf83f9,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video SAINT PAUL, Minn. — The federal agency that runs Medicaid is threatening to withhold payments to Minnesota programs unless the state addresses widespread fraud. The announcement came on social media over the weekend by former TV personality Dr. Mehmet Oz, who now leads the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. T","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
SAINT PAUL, Minn. — The federal agency that runs Medicaid is threatening to withhold payments to Minnesota programs unless the state addresses widespread fraud.
The announcement came on social media over the weekend by former TV personality Dr. Mehmet Oz, who now leads the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
The Minnesota Department of Human Services has already added restrictions to 14 programs it has deemed high-risk because of fraud.
Now they'll have additional oversight from the federal agency.
""We're gonna crush waste, fraud, and abuse,"" Dr. Oz said in a video posted on social media, blasting Minnesota Governor Tim Walz concerning fraud within government programs that rely on Medicaid reimbursements.
""Our message to Walz is clear: either fix this in 60 days or start looking under your couch for spare change, because we are done footing the bill for your incompetence,"" Oz said.
In October, the state Department of Human Services announced it was withholding payments and auditing what it identified as the 14 highest-risk programs for fraud.
In his letter delivered to Governor Walz, Dr. Oz laid out additional requirements for Minnesota to continue receiving federal Medicaid Money:
""When these scammers realized that nobody was guarding the cash register, they went gangbusters,"" Oz said.
A statement from the Department of Human Services in response: ""Many of the recommendations from CMS are based on work we have already started. We are reviewing the request from CMS for additional information about the anti-fraud work underway and will be connecting with CMS.""
Governor Walz issued a similar statement that says in part: ""We are glad to see CMS affirming the Governor's executive action and look forward to continuing to work together.""
The federal government provides about half of Minnesota's Medicaid funding, so if CMS did freeze it, DHS programs would not have zero funding; however, Minnesota would likely not be able to support the Medicaid programs on the state's percentage alone."
kare11.com,FULL COVERAGE: Feeding Our Future fraud scheme,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/local/feeding-our-future-investigation/full-coverage-feeding-our-future-fraud-scheme/89-c288f8ca-2b8d-405f-b027-e15035bf42bf,,,"MINNEAPOLIS — In 2022, a federal investigation revealed allegations of widespread fraud in connection with a program meant to provide meals to children in need during the pandemic. Prosecutors alleged hundreds of millions of dollars were stolen and misused by people associated with an organization known as Feeding Our Future. Since that time, dozens of people have been charged, convicted, or pleaded guilty in the case. Find links to KARE 11's coverage below: JANUARY 2022 FEBRUARY 2022 MARCH 2022","MINNEAPOLIS — In 2022, a federal investigation revealed allegations of widespread fraud in connection with a program meant to provide meals to children in need during the pandemic. Prosecutors alleged hundreds of millions of dollars were stolen and misused by people associated with an organization known as Feeding Our Future.
Since that time, dozens of people have been charged, convicted, or pleaded guilty in the case.
Find links to KARE 11's coverage below:
JANUARY 2022
FEBRUARY 2022
MARCH 2022
APRIL 2022
SEPTEMBER 2022
OCTOBER 2022
NOVEMBER 2022
JANUARY 2023
FEBRUARY 2023
MARCH 2023
APRIL 2023
MAY 2023
JUNE 2023
AUGUST 2023
OCTOBER 2023
DECEMBER 2023
JANUARY 2024
FEBRUARY 2024
APRIL 2024
MAY 2024
JUNE 2024
JULY 2024
SEPTEMBER 2024
OCTOBER 2024
NOVEMBER 2024
DECEMBER 2024
JANUARY 2025
FEBRUARY 2025
MARCH 2025
APRIL 2025
MAY 2025
JUNE 2025
JULY 2025
AUGUST 2025
SEPTEMBER 2025
OCTOBER 2025
NOVEMBER 2025"
kare11.com,Links featured on KARE 11 News,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/local/kare-11-news-featured-links/89-44022f85-e470-46e3-a182-8a540ce42946,,,"GOLDEN VALLEY, Minn. — Here are some of the latest links featured on KARE 11 newscasts. KARE 11 News at 6 The St. Paul Downtown Alliance is asking your input on what is and isn't working in the city's downtown core. Click here for more information on how you can share your thoughts. KARE 11 News at 5 A coalition of legal aid organizations put together an ""Immigration Hub"" in anticipation of the federal immigration enforcement ramp-up which is currently unfolding in the Twin Cities. Click here fo","GOLDEN VALLEY, Minn. — Here are some of the latest links featured on KARE 11 newscasts.
KARE 11 News at 6
The St. Paul Downtown Alliance is asking your input on what is and isn't working in the city's downtown core. Click here for more information on how you can share your thoughts.
KARE 11 News at 5
A coalition of legal aid organizations put together an ""Immigration Hub"" in anticipation of the federal immigration enforcement ramp-up which is currently unfolding in the Twin Cities. Click here for more on knowing your rights.
KARE 11 News at 6
Christmas tree permits are available to purchase online through Recreation.gov . Details about designated cutting areas, dates, and types of trees that may be cut may be found here .
KARE 11 News at 4
Minnesota food shelves are bracing for an influx of people in need of services with federal SNAP benefit distributions set to pause indefinitely in November amid the ongoing federal government shutdown.
Here's what to know about food shelves in Minnesota .
KARE 11 News at 4
Doctors recommend checking out bike and scooter helmet ratings before buying one; Virginia Tech University regularly posts its helmet test ratings in collaboration with the Insurance Institute for Highway Safety. You can find the ratings at this link on the Virginia Tech website.
Breaking the News
Led by Sara Jespersen, owner of The Lumberjack, and Heather Rutledge, director of ArtReach St Croix, along with the support of local Union Alley businesses, Union Art Alley was created to provide a truly unique space that celebrates the power of street art to transform and inspire.
For more information, click here.
KARE 11 News at 5
A fundraiser has been established to help with relief and rebuilding efforts for the people impacted by the floods. To donate, click here .
KARE 11 News at 6
As Burnsville remembers police officers Paul Elmstrand and Matthew Ruge and firefighter-paramedic Adam Finseth on the one year anniversary of their deaths, supporters hope to send the families to Washington D.C. in May, where Officers Elmstrand and Ruge will be honored at the National Law Enforcement Memorial ceremony on May 15, as the names of the fallen will be read aloud. Finseth will be honored at the National Fallen Firefighters Memorial during events May 3-4 in Emmitsburg, Maryland.
If you would like to support the efforts, follow this link to a GoFundMe fundraiser organized by the Minnesota Fraternal Order of Police raising $100,000 for travel expenses.
KARE 11 News at 6
The Minnesota Department of Agriculture has sources for farmers who may be feeling stress, anxiety or depression. For more on these resources, click here .
Noon
Mill City Museum is asking for the public’s support to take the top spot in an online contest to win the title of the Nation’s Best History Museum. Vote by clicking here .
KARE 11 News at 6
Twin Cities Habitat for Humanity is joining Habitat organizations around the globe in honoring the countless contributions President Jimmy Carter has made to the organization and to Habitat homeowners over four decades. Twin Cities Habitat will raise walls with doors in them to symbolize the many doors of opportunity that President Carter helped make possible through his life of service to others. Community members are invited to pay a personal tribute to President Carter by signing the wall and door with their name or personal message.
KARE 11 News at 6
Tickets for the 2026 IIHF World Junior Hockey Championship are on sale right now. Games will be hosted right here in Minnesota, over at The X and 3M Arena at Mariucci. It showcases some of the best men's hockey players in the world under 20 years old.
Today marks the official start of Kwanzaa, the annual seven-day observance of African-American history. Click here for events at Midtown Global Market.
Breaking the News
Richard Herod III was famous for his ads with the White Bear Mitsubishi mascot and his big heart for helping others. Click here to see more information on the fundraiser for his brain injury.
Noon
Navigate your financial journey with Wayzata Bay Private Wealth Management here.
KARE 11 News at 6
The Original Mattress Factory is hosting a drive for ""Bring a Blanket for Bridging"" - a nonprofit that provides home essentials for people in need. Bridging is seeking blankets of all sizes, with full-size and queen in high demand.
For more information, visit the Original Mattress Factory's website here.
KARE 11 News at 6
Nate and Katie's dog, Pearl, recently had an emergency vet visit after being pulled from a house fire on Oct. 26 in Scandia. Pearl spent two days in an oxygen tent at an emergency vet clinic before returning home. To help with Pearl's medical expenses, click here .
Breaking the News
The National Marrow Donor Program (NMDP), formerly known as Be The Match, is holding its first live fundraising event this weekend.  The Minneapolis event will have a DJ, several artists and even Timberwolves Center Naz Reid.
Click here for more information
KARE 11 News at 5
Reading Partners Twin Cities is now in 10 local schools and just expanded to Faribault. You do have to clear a background check before volunteering. For more information, click here.
KARE 11 News at 5
Here's a list of the best and worst mosquito repellents, according to the experts.
KARE 11 News at 6
Police Officers Federation of Minneapolis, Law Enforcement Labor Services (LELS) and the Minneapolis Police and Peace Officers Association (MPPOA) are collecting donations to support fallen MPD Officer Jamal Mitchell through the LELS Benevolent Fund , where all proceeds will go directly to Officer Mitchell's family.
KARE 11 News at Noon
Here's more information about the group of young people that joined Alexis on set.
5 p.m.
Check out the design website to learn more about the Minnesota Capitol Mall design project .
5 p.m.
Francesco Della Ferrara hosts a Timberwolves podcast , while also managing a YouTube and Instagram page to help grow the team’s popularity.
10 p.m.
Concerned about memory lapses? Here are some of the resources we shared:
Studies:
Tips to boost or maintain brain function:
BTN
A new documentary entitled "" Sequencing Hope "" tells the story of a family’s battle with their insurance company to get a life-saving experimental treatment. For information on how to view this film, click here .
Sunrise
Hope 4 Youth is a nonprofit based in Anoka that works to end youth homelessness in the state. For more information or to get involved, click here .
KARE 11 News at Noon
2024 Flavor of the Fair - Midwest Dairy is calling on ice cream enthusiasts to vote for one of three offerings that are finalists for this year's official flavor at the Great Minnesota Get-Together. Voting ends April 19. To vote, click here .
BTN
The puck drops on the NCAA Frozen Four Thursday night at the Xcel Energy Center with Boston facing off against Denver at 5 p.m., followed by Boston College and Michigan at 8 p.m. The winners will meet in the championship on Saturday at 6 p.m. For more information, click here .
Sunrise
Rabbi Aaron Weininger is taking on the role of Senior Rabbi at Adath Jeshurun Congregation. The congregation states on its website that he is the first openly gay person appointed to the position of Senior Rabbi in a large Conservative congregation.
To celebrate his appointment to the role, there will be several services and events through the weekend of April 5-7. For tickets or more information, click here .
6 p.m.
Timberwolves star Karl-Anthony Towns is asking fans to donate $32 or more in an effort to support youth mental health programming at Boys and Girls Clubs of the Twin Cities.
If you'd like to learn more or contribute , click here.
Sunrise
The Ordway's GreenRoom program is a six-week training fellowship for Minnesota actors, dancers and singers. For more information and to apply, click here .
5 p.m.
Reading Partners is a nonprofit that provides schools with 1-on-1 tutoring. If you're interested in volunteering, click here .
4 p.m.
The MBR Foundation is the charitable arm of Must Be Ruff Gourmet Dog Treats , an organization working to teach kids the benefits of having compassion for animals. Cricket Wireless has stepped up as a major sponsor for MBR in the effort to support local Black-owned businesses during Black History Month and beyond.
Click here to learn more.
BTN
The Minneapolis Institute of Art is uniting art lovers this Valentine’s week. From now through Thursday, visitors can take part in the ""Institute of Hearts"" by leaving a paper heart with the artwork they love the most. The event will culminate with a special ""Meet at Mia"" event on Thursday night. Live music, art making and other interactive events will help connect art lovers with the museum – and each other – in new ways.
BTN
This summer, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (PUC) will consider a proposal by Xcel Energy to move residential customers to a time-of-use (TOU) rate design. The plan would charge customers more for using electricity during peak hours (3 p.m. to 8 p.m. weekdays) and less for energy usage during overnight hours (midnight to 6 a.m.) The PUC currently has an open notice of comment period on the proposal until April 15. To learn more about getting involved, watch this video or visit the website .
Sunrise
With the unseasonably warm weather, some golf courses are opening in Minnesota and western Wisconsin. Click here for the list .
Sunrise
The Bond Between shelter welcomed more than 100 animals from high-risk shelters and they are looking for volunteers to foster these animals. To learn more about fostering or to see the adorable animals that need foster homes, click here .
Breaking The News
The University of Minnesota is looking to partner with farmers outside the metro, offering $25,000 to help build and maintain deep winter greenhouses for three years. To apply, click here .
Breaking The News
The puck drops on Team Minnesota's season on Wednesday, Jan. 3 in Boston, with their home opener slated for Saturday, Jan. 6 at the Xcel Energy Center. For information on how to purchase tickets, click here .
Breaking the News
Family gatherings during the holidays provide an opportunity to discuss important health-related wishes and to share important family medical histories that could save lives. Here are three resources if you’re interested in discussing three key topics.
Sunrise
The Rebound Club aims to give patients at M Health Fairview Masonic Children's Hospital the chance to attend Minnesota Timberwolves games. To donate, click here . For more information on the club, click here .
5 p.m.
Ellie Mental Health's limited-edition wrapping paper gives the gift of raising awareness on mental health and coping skills during the holidays.
For more, click here.
6 p.m.
After reaching their travel goal, the Minnesota Jays won the national championship over the weekend. A new fundraiser has been set up to help with new equipment and travel arrangements for next season. For more, click here .
Noon
The Professional Women's Hockey League (PWHL) has launched its new fan apparel line in partnership with Line Change, a women-owned company founded to offer more gear options for female fans. To purchase, click here.
Noon
People are delivering the gift of warmth on Thursday, Dec. 13 for the 8th Annual Homeless Youth Winter Wear Drive. To donate, click here .
6 p.m.
If you or someone in your life could benefit from naloxone, a drug used to reverse an opioid overdose, click here .
5 p.m.
To see more adoptable dogs from Underdog Rescue, click here.
6 p.m.
This nonprofit accumulates on-trend clothing for teens and young adults and creates a comfortable environment for folks in need.
Sunrise
If you've lost something at MSP Airport or had an issue with your checked baggage, file a report at this link .
Sunrise
Do your kids want to write a letter to Santa? The City of Plymouth is accepting letters and Santa's helpers will collect them and write back.
The mailbox is open Nov. 20 - Dec. 1. Families can drop off a self-addressed, stamped envelope at either Plymouth City Hall at 3400 Plymouth Blvd.; Plymouth Ice Center at 3650 Plymouth Blvd.; or Plymouth Community Center at 14800 34th Ave. N.
BTN
GoFundMe pages for WFNY Frogtown Community Radio in St. Paul and KTIS have been created to help both stations stay afloat. To help WFNY, click here . To donate to KTIS, click here .
Sunrise
Brighter Days Family Grief Center is a non-profit based in Eden Prairie. They rely on grants and donations to give grieving families money, gift cards and other gifts. To donate or read more about how you can help, click on this link .
6 p.m.
For 140 years, the steeple over Calvary Baptist has towered over the Whittier neighborhood of Minneapolis. Now the congregation is raising money hoping to preserve its history. Follow this link to find out how you can help donate on the church's website .
Breaking the News
Patty Wetterling's memoir chronicling her life through the disappearance and murder of her son, Jacob, went on sale Tuesday and has already become a U.S. best-selling biography.
To hear more about Patty's story, click here to view a schedule of Patty's upcoming book signings around Minnesota.
Breaking the News
Submissions are now being accepted to redesign Minnesota's state seal and state flag. Each person can submit up to three designs.
Submissions are due by Oct. 30, as the State Emblems Redesign Commission works to adopt new symbols for the state by Jan. 1.
Breaking the News
The Met Council is no longer updating it’s COVID wastewater dashboard, but the University of Minnesota provides an interactive statewide map that provides weekly updates (every Friday) from more than 30 wastewater plants across the state. Updated search features are coming in the days ahead.
Click here for more.
Sunrise
Too Good to Go is offered as an app on the App Store or on Google Play. Users can purchase surprise bags of surplus food from restaurants or shops. To download, click here .
Melanie Jansen and Hannah Parmenter were identified as two of the victims of a murder-suicide at a Breezy Point resort on Tuesday, Sept. 5.
A GoFundMe created on behalf of Melanie and Hannah's families described the pair as ""kind, generous, selfless, and genuine."" According to the fundraiser, Hannah leaves behind a husband, and Melanie leaves behind a son and daughter-in-law.
The Twin Cities Walk to End Alzheimer's is scheduled for Sept. 30 at Target Field. To register for the walk or donate to the cause, click here .
BTN
Centro Tyrone Guzman, the oldest and largest multi-service Latine organization in Minneapolis, is mourning the loss of its long-time leader, Roxana Linares Arrieta. For more information on the remembrance, click here .
BTN
For more information on how to get your free COVID testing kits from the Minnesota Department of Health, click here.
Sunrise
For more information on the Walk for Alopecia, click here . For more information on the Hair Cut-A-Thon at Studio Alles in Roseville, click here .
6 a.m.
If your pet is exposed to something harmful, call the Pet Poison Helpline at (855) 764-7661 or go to their website for information on potential poisons. An $85 incident fee is applied if you call.
4 p.m.
If you or someone you know is facing a mental health crisis, there is help available from the following resources:
6 p.m.
Are you wondering how and how often Hennepin County officials test the water at public beaches to make sure they're safe for swimming?
You can visit the county's interactive map here.
BTN
The Protez Foundation helped fit Ukrainian Artum Svergon for a prosthetic after he lost part of his leg during the Russian invasion. The foundation, which has helped fit at least 90 Ukrainians with prosthetics, is accepting donations to help bring other Ukrainians to Minnesota. To donate, click here .
Breaking the News
A north Minneapolis dance studio that serves young Black girls is celebrating a huge win.
The athletes with the nonprofit Dance City just got back from a competition in Las Vegas, where they beat out hundreds of other teams to become national champions.
Now, Dance City is hoping to raise $100,000 to send the team to train in Los Angeles and New York City with some of the best dancers and companies in the country.
If you'd like to support the national champion Dance City Dance Team, you can visit the GoFundMe here.
Breaking the News
The Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport released its draft Long-Term Plan, which includes initiatives like adding new gates, connecting Terminals 1 and 2, and revamping parking ramps.
The draft was released for public viewing and written comments, which will be accepted until Monday, August 21, 2023, at 5:00 p.m.
For more information, click here.
Breaking the News
An aluminum shortage coupled with a spring surge of kittens is keeping pet food donations at rescues low — resulting in a desperate need.
Ruff Start Rescue is currently out of canned kitten food and asking for the public’s help to supply the 16 cases a day needed to feed the 200+ kittens currently in the rescue.
If you’d like to donate, click here or here.
Breaking the News
If you're interested in signing up to volunteer at this year's Twin Cities Pride Festival, particularly to march in Saturday's parade, visit the event's website.
6 p.m.
A GoFundMe has been set up to support the family of Ku Soe, a St. Paul student who drowned in Carver Lake earlier this month.
If you'd like to donate, click here.
The Bush Foundation selects 24 community leaders from across Minnesota and the Dakotas each year. Fellows receive $1,000 grants toward bettering themselves and their missions in fields ranging from public safety to education, architecture, health, and advocacy.
For a full list, click here.
Breaking the News
Pride Flags for West St Paul is taking donations in order to buy and distribute Pride flags to anyone in the community who would like to celebrate Pride month or show support for their LGBTQ neighbors.
Here’s a link to donate.
Here’s a link to the request form if you’d like to receive a flag:
5 p.m. - Toys for Tots' Summer Initiative
Click here to see how to monetarily help Toys for Tots.
Breaking the News
If you or someone you know is experiencing domestic violence and needs help, call 800-799-7233 or text START to 88788.
You will be connected with someone from the National Domestic Violence Hotline. The hotline includes more options for support and identifiers of abuse on its website .
For Minnesota residents, Cornerstone MN offers resources and safe housing for domestic abuse survivors and crime victims. Call 1-866-223-1111 or chat online with the crisis hotline.
ADDITIONAL RESOURCES:
DayOne Crisis Hotline
Esperanza United
LoveIsRespect.org
StrongHearts Native Helpline
Violence Free Minnesota
Breaking the News
The Minneapolis Park and Recreation Board in partnership with the Berger Task Force is planning to rebuild Berger Fountain (Dandelion Fountain) in Loring Park. View the three design concepts based on initial feedback that was received earlier this spring.
Breaking the News
Open Road Fund is a community resource granting $50 million to Black folks in Minnesota, North Dakota and South Dakota in order to create tangible pathways to liberation, prosperity, and healing on our own terms.
The Open Road Fund is stewarded by Nexus Community Partners and resourced by the Bush Foundation.
Click here to learn more."
kare11.com,Minneapolis man sentenced to 7 years after admitting to stealing millions from COVID-19 relief programs,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/local/minneapolis-man-sentenced-7-years-after-admitting-to-stealing-millions-from-covid-19-relief-programs/89-8c953f8d-dffd-4f2e-8316-e5c67736d479,,,"MINNEAPOLIS — A Minneapolis man was sentenced to seven years in prison after admitting to stealing about $3.5 million from COVID pandemic programs. Tezzaree El-Amin Champion pleaded guilty in February to wire fraud, money laundering, and possession of a firearm as a felon in connection with a pandemic fraud case that attempted to defraud federal, state, local, and private COVID-19 relief programs out of approximately $6 million in total. As part of the sentencing, Champion will also need to pay ","MINNEAPOLIS — A Minneapolis man was sentenced to seven years in prison after admitting to stealing about $3.5 million from COVID pandemic programs.
Tezzaree El-Amin Champion pleaded guilty in February to wire fraud, money laundering, and possession of a firearm as a felon in connection with a pandemic fraud case that attempted to defraud federal, state, local, and private COVID-19 relief programs out of approximately $6 million in total. As part of the sentencing, Champion will also need to pay nearly $3.5 million in restitution.
Champion’s company, Futuristic Management Group, scammed the Small Business Administration’s Paycheck Protection Program and Economic Injury Disaster Loan program, as well as Hennepin County’s Small Business Relief grant program by dramatically overstating applicant income and expenses and submitting fake tax records and lease documents, according to his plea agreement. Prosecutors determined that part of the scheme caused more than $2.1 million in losses.
Champion admitted submitting fraudulent invoices to Hennepin County’s Elevate Business program, which the county hired Futuristic Management under, despite Champion’s recent violent felony conviction prosecuted by the Hennepin County Attorney’s Office.
One role Champion’s business was supposed to perform while in Hennepin County’s Elevate Business program was to help struggling businesses apply for grants and loans. However, according to Champion’s admissions in his plea agreement, they helped ineligible businesses apply for that money in return for kickbacks. Champion’s business also double-billed for website design, sending invoices to both the county and the company he was helping.
In his guilty plea, Champion also admitted to fraud committed through Encouraging Leaders, a nonprofit he founded and led, which claimed to empower underrepresented youth in Minneapolis.
Under Champion’s direction, the nonprofit applied for 42 grants, attempting to obtain $3.8 million in funding. He ended up receiving about $1.5 million from various governments and companies, including Hennepin County, City of Minneapolis, U.S. Department of Justice, Minnesota Department of Education, Minnesota Department of Human Services, Minnesota State Arts Board, Otto Bremer Trust, Greater Twin Cities United Way, and others, according to the plea agreement."
kare11.com,Police investigating homicide in St. Paul apartment building,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/local/police-investigating-homicide-st-paul-apartment-building/89-d6061277-3656-4810-a615-324e8b7cebc6,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video ST PAUL, Minn. — St. Paul Police are trying to find out what happened to a woman who was found dead in an apartment on Friday. According to the St. Paul Police Department, they were called to an apartment complex on Broadway Street in the Dayton's Bluff neighborhood on the report that a woman had been shot. When polic","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
ST PAUL, Minn. — St. Paul Police are trying to find out what happened to a woman who was found dead in an apartment on Friday.
According to the St. Paul Police Department, they were called to an apartment complex on Broadway Street in the Dayton's Bluff neighborhood on the report that a woman had been shot.
When police arrived, they found the adult woman dead from a gunshot wound. Officials say they believe the victim was shot the day prior to being found.
St. Paul Police say they are investigating this as a homicide, but also said they are waiting for the Ramsey County Medical Examiner’s Office to determine her exact cause of death.
Police say an active search for a suspect is underway."
kare11.com,U.S. Treasury Department investigating tax fraud allegations in Minnesota,https://www.kare11.com/article/news/politics/us-treasury-department-investigating-tax-fraud-allegations-in-minnesota/89-c69733d5-93a8-4b17-b6ba-d8d51aad5f50,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video VIENNA, Va. — Allegations that money from massive fraud schemes conducted in Minnesota is making its way into the hands of terrorists are now officially under investigation by the U.S. Treasury Department. Treasury Secretary Scott Bissent announced on X Monday that his department is launching the investigation to ensu","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
VIENNA, Va. — Allegations that money from massive fraud schemes conducted in Minnesota is making its way into the hands of terrorists are now officially under investigation by the U.S. Treasury Department.
Treasury Secretary Scott Bissent announced on X Monday that his department is launching the investigation to ensure that taxes paid by Americans ""are not funding acts of global terror."" The post also blames ""feckless mismanagement"" by the administration of former President Joe Biden and Minnesota Governor Tim Walz for the possibility that funds are being sent overseas to the terrorist organization Al Shabaab.
At my direction, @USTreasury is investigating allegations that under the feckless mismanagement of the Biden Administration and Governor Tim Walz, hardworking Minnesotans’ tax dollars may have been diverted to the terrorist organization Al-Shabaab. Thanks to the leadership of… https://t.co/uillMknuXL
News of the federal fraud probe comes as President Trump seems increasingly focused on Somalis, particularly those living in Minnesota. On Tuesday, the New York Times reported that the Trump administration is launching an intensive immigration enforcement operation that will target undocumented Somalis in the Minneapolis-St. Paul area. The report referenced an official with knowledge of the operation and documents obtained by the paper.
KARE 11's Lou Raguse reported last week that President Trump's recent decision to end Temporary Protected Status for Somalis in America is believed to be prompted by a viral article written by a conservative activist claiming tax money stolen in fraud schemes - such as Feeding our Future - is funding Al-Shabaab, which is based in Somalia.
The headline of that article, posted online by the conservative outlet City Journal, reads ""The Largest Funder of Al-Shabaab Is the Minnesota Taxpayer.""
The U.S. Attorney's Office says the Feeding Our Future scam alone siphoned off approximately $300 million in taxpayer funds intended to feed children in need during the COVID pandemic, and that millions of those funds were sent to Kenya, not Somalia.
But lesser amounts were likely sent to family and friends in Somalia, and Tricia Bacon, former Counterterrorism Analyst at the U.S. State Department, says Al-Shabaab may have tapped into that money through taxes or extortion.
""Nobody has to 'mean' to fund Al-Shabaab,"" Bacon said. ""But that's sort of the cost of doing business in Somalia because the government has been so ineffective at protecting people from Al-Shabaab's extortion that, you know, you don't really have a choice of whether or not to pay.""
Republicans, both at the federal and local levels, began calling for an investigation after the publication of the City Journal article, and are now applauding the Treasury Secretary's announcement. ""We welcome the U.S. Treasury investigation and federal scrutiny into where these fraud dollars are going, something Governor Walz has never been willing to do himself,"" said State Senators Jordan Rasmusson (R-Fergus Falls) and Paul Utke (R-Park Rapids) in a joint statement. ""Whether fraud was being used for personal enrichment, or being siphoned by terrorist organizations overseas, the reality is that no other state has seen these brazen fraud schemes stealing more than a billion dollars from public funds. Minnesotans deserve to know exactly where these fraudulent dollars were going and what they were being used for.""
The rift between the Trump administration and Governor Walz has grown increasingly heated and public in recent days, with the President posting that ""hundreds of thousands of refugees from Somalia are completely taking over the once great State of Minnesota."" Trump then referred to the governor as ""seriously retarded,"" igniting anger and disapproval from educators and groups that advocate for the disabled.
Walz pushed back hard on NBC's ""Meet the Press,"" saying Trump's use of the R-word was both damaging and hurtful. The governor also criticized Trump for demonizing an entire community for the acts of a few."
kare11.com,Vikings coach Kevin O'Connell has stressed winning the turnover battle. Sunday's win proved why,https://www.kare11.com/article/sports/nfl/vikings/vikings-coach-kevin-oconnell-winning-the-turnover-battle-sundays-win-proved-why/89-5c90f7f4-3248-4d08-9f31-bfd0ff291f62,,,"EAGAN, Minn. — For weeks. Minnesota Vikings coach Kevin O'Connell has stressed the importance of winning the turnover battle. One year after finishing the regular season tied for the most takeaways (33), the Vikings have one of the worst turnover differentials in the league (minus-12), while turning the ball over more than any other team in the NFL. Sunday's shutout against the Washington Commanders marked just the second time this season the Vikings (5-8) had a clean sheet with no turnovers. It","EAGAN, Minn. — For weeks. Minnesota Vikings coach Kevin O'Connell has stressed the importance of winning the turnover battle.
One year after finishing the regular season tied for the most takeaways (33), the Vikings have one of the worst turnover differentials in the league (minus-12), while turning the ball over more than any other team in the NFL.
Sunday's shutout against the Washington Commanders marked just the second time this season the Vikings (5-8) had a clean sheet with no turnovers. It was also the second-most forced turnovers (3) for a defense that has struggled to take the ball away from opposing offenses this season.
""You tend to win ball games when you do that,"" Vikings safety Harrison Smith said after recording his 38th career interception — fourth-most in Vikings history . ""We talk about it a lot, we just haven't done enough to make it happen this year. When it does, though, it's a lot of fun.""
While it didn't count as an official ""turnover,"" O'Connell highlighted the magnitude of the first defensive stop against the Commanders, when they turned away Washington's offense near the goal line on fourth down. The Commanders had marched 83 yards to Minnesota's 2-yard line before the Vikings defense forced three incomplete passes — including one on fourth down — to give the offense a chance to build on their early lead.
The offense did its part, converting on five third downs in a 19-play, 98-yard touchdown drive to stretch the lead to 14-0. It was the team's longest drive since at least 2000 , according to Vikings Communications, and was the first 12-minute drive by any team in the league in four years.
""It was a pretty unique way to start fast,"" O'Connell said. ""It wasn't necessarily explosives and throwing the ball all over the yard, but very efficient, and I was really proud of the guys the way we did that.""
McCarthy started fast and put together his most complete game of the season — completing 69.6 of his passes and throwing for a career-high three touchdowns — but perhaps most importantly, it was the first turnover-free game of his young career.
""The boys and I, we're coming off a great win, but there's a lot of things that we need to fix,"" McCarthy said. ""A lot of ways we can get better and continue to grow as an offense, defense and special teams.""
One way the offense can grow is by capitalizing more on turnovers. While the Vikings were able to turn three turnovers into 10 points against Washington, McCarthy admitted that there were points left on the table. Edge rusher Andrew Van Ginkel tipped a pass to himself for an interception early in the third quarter that gave the Vikings the ball at Washington's 30-yard line. However, the Vikings settled for a 45-yard field goal after going three-and-out on offense.
""Going three-and-out there is something that sits with us as an offense, me personally,"" McCarthy said. ""Just amking sure we capitalize on those turnovers because that changes the momentum of the entire game.""
The Vikings could have more opportunities this weekend when they go against a Dallas team that has the fourth-worst turnover differential (minus-8) in the league.
Despite the lack of production this season from the run game — in part due to playing from behind in so many games — the Vikings have been effective when they've handed the ball off.
At 4.6 yards per carry, Minnesota is tied for 10th-best in the league with the fourth-fewest attempts (292). Against Washington, the Vikings were playing with a multi-score lead for the majority of the game, which paved the way for a bigger emphasis on running the ball.
Minnesota combined for 162 yards on 24 carries (4.8 yards per attempt) for the second-highest rush total of the season. The only other game where they amassed more rushing yards was in Week 3 against Cincinnati, where the Vikings ran for 169 yards in the 48-10 victory.
The Vikings are 4-2 this season when they've run for 100 or more yards on the ground and 3-0 when they rush for more than 120 yards.
""We were consistently getting some knockback into the defensive front and getting runs started,"" O'Connell said of Sunday's run game. ""I thought our backs were really decisive. ... A really positive day running the football.""
The Cowboys are allowing 123.5 yards rushing per game this season, so there will be some opportunities for the Vikings to eclipse that 120-yard mark.
Tight ends can have a major impact in the running game, but against Washington, some of their biggest contributions came through the air.
All three of McCarthy's touchdown passes were to tight ends — two to Josh Oliver and one to T.J. Hockenson — as the position continues to be a target near the red zone. Of the Vikings' 16 passing touchdowns this season, 43.8% have been to tight ends.
Oliver leads the team with four, which is also a career-high for the 28-year-old, who is known more for his blocking ability.
""Just trying to play in a style where it's easy for our guys,"" said O'Connell of using the tight ends in Sunday's win. ""We lined up in a lot of different ways, but yet some formulas of how we wanted to play to try and pair some things together both with the run and the pass."""
kare11.com,Wild acquire star defenseman Quinn Hughes from the Canucks in a blockbuster NHL trade,https://www.kare11.com/article/syndication/associatedpress/wild-acquire-quinn-hughes-from-the-canucks-in-a-blockbuster-nhl-trade/616-ddca117a-0fb7-4311-b025-a25ccd9b7dd0,,,"The Minnesota Wild made an all-in move for one of the NHL's best players in his prime, acquiring defenseman Quinn Hughes from the Vancouver Canucks in a blockbuster trade — their boldest action yet toward ending a decade-long skid of playoff series defeats. The teams announced the seismic move on Friday night, after the 2024 Norris Trophy winner as the league's top defenseman had been the most talked-about trade candidate over the past couple of weeks. Minnesota sent center Marco Rossi, defensem","The Minnesota Wild made an all-in move for one of the NHL's best players in his prime, acquiring defenseman Quinn Hughes from the Vancouver Canucks in a blockbuster trade — their boldest action yet toward ending a decade-long skid of playoff series defeats.
The teams announced the seismic move on Friday night, after the 2024 Norris Trophy winner as the league's top defenseman had been the most talked-about trade candidate over the past couple of weeks. Minnesota sent center Marco Rossi, defenseman Zeev Buium, winger Liam Ohgren and a first-round pick in the 2026 draft to suddenly rebuilding Vancouver to complete the deal.
The trade was the second major swap of the day, after two-time Stanley Cup Final runner-up Edmonton finally made a move for a goaltender, acquiring Tristan Jarry from Pittsburgh.
Rossi (24), Ohgren (21) and Buium (20) fit the mold of the young talent the Canucks were speculated to be targeting if they were going to trade Hughes. Rossi (2020), Ohgren (2022) and Buium (2024) were all recent first-round draft picks by the Wild.
“Quinn played hard, led by example and did a lot of very good things for the Canucks,"" Vancouver general manager Patrik Allvin said. ""Trading away a player of this caliber is never an easy decision to make, but it was one we had to do to make our team better. We are so excited to add a solid centre in Marco, a good young blueliner in Zeev and a versatile forward in Liam. This year’s draft is a strong one, so acquiring a first-round pick was also a big part of this deal.”
Hughes had no trade-blocking protection in his current deal that pays him an average of $7.85 million annually. Hughes, who is 26 and widely considered the best at player on the blue line behind only Colorado’s Cale Makar, is signed through the 2026-27 season before he can become an unrestricted free agent.
The Wild will not be allowed to extend Hughes until July 1, and it’s unclear if he would consider signing a new contract with them. There has been plenty of buzz around the league that Quinn wants to play with his brothers, Jack and Luke, with the New Jersey Devils.
They could potentially be teammates on the U.S. Olympic team, either in February in Milan or in 2030. Wild general manager Bill Guerin runs USA Hockey’s management team .
The long-term outlook for Hughes can wait until next summer, though. The Wild are focused on challenging the two top teams ahead of them in the loaded Central Division, rivals that happen to also have the top two records in the NHL: Colorado and Dallas.
The season-long celebration of the franchise's 25th anniversary would be a lot more meaningful if the Wild can finally advance in the playoffs, having lost nine straight series after a first-round victory over St. Louis in 2015. The Wild have passed the second round just once in their entire existence, when they were swept in the Western Conference finals by Anaheim in 2003.
Hughes is a significant upgrade to Minnesota's blue line, anchored by captain and 16-year veteran Jared Spurgeon, smooth-skating 14-year veteran Jonas Brodin and young stalwart Brock Faber. The emergence of rookie goalie Jesper Wallstedt this season has given the Wild a reliable tandem with Filip Gustavsson in the net, with star winger Kirill Kaprizov leading the attack after recently signing the richest contract in hockey history to stay in the “State of Hockey” through 2034.
After a rough start, the Wild are 14-3-2 since Nov. 1. They host Ottawa on Saturday and Boston on Sunday night, with the latter game likely the more realistic one for Hughes to debut.
Hughes had two goals, 21 assists and 32 blocked shots in 23 games this season with the last-in-the-NHL Canucks. When he won the Norris Trophy two seasons ago, Hughes had 17 goals and 75 assists, both single-season franchise records for defensemen and the most among all blue liners in the league. Drafted seventh overall in 2018 out of Michigan, the native of Orlando, Florida, spent time growing up in the Boston and Toronto areas while his father, a hockey coach, moved around.
This was Hughes' third season as Vancouver's captain, and his abrupt exit paves the way for more change 11 months since the trade of J.T. Miller to the New York Rangers and in the aftermath of coach Rick Tocchet's departure .
“With the circumstances surrounding J.T. and now Quinn, we are fortunate to acquire these very good young players from Minnesota,” Canucks president of hockey operations Jim Rutherford said. ""They will be a key part of the rebuild that we are currently in, giving us a bright future moving forward. The hockey club will continue to build with talented young players using that as a blueprint to become a contender sooner rather than later.”
___
AP NHL: https://www.apnews.com/hub/NHL"
kare11.com,WEATHER: Frigid weekend wind chills,https://www.kare11.com/article/weather/forecast/latest-minnesota-weather/89-d44129df-c1cb-4874-9a11-9e5ae525daeb,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video MINNESOTA, USA — The Arctic cold is set to arrive this weekend. Even by January standards (note: it is December), this will be frigid, especially when factoring in the wind on Saturday. Air temperatures will have a tough time reaching zero on Saturday and the wind chill is forecast to be in the -20s and -30s all day. ","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
MINNESOTA, USA — The Arctic cold is set to arrive this weekend.
Even by January standards (note: it is December), this will be frigid, especially when factoring in the wind on Saturday. Air temperatures will have a tough time reaching zero on Saturday and the wind chill is forecast to be in the -20s and -30s all day.
Because of the unseasonably cold air, the KARE 11 Weather Team has issued a Weather Impact Alert for all of Saturday and the first half of Sunday.
While our temperatures may only warm a handful of degrees on Saturday, our wind chills will hover near -20° nearly all day long.
Our winds will settle down Sunday morning before shifting to the south later in the day, but our wind chills will continue to range from -25 to -15 degrees nearly all day long. On a side note, the record cold temperature at MSP for Sunday is -27. A bit of good news... we won't get that cold!
We'll be forced to brave the frigid wind chills this weekend, but a modest warming trend is set to take place towards the middle of next week taking wind chills in a significantly warmer direction.
That midweek warm up will include temperatures that take us above freezing and include overnight lows that are quite mild for this time of year. Most storm systems next week will run across southern Canada reducing our chances for any major snowfall; however, we are watching our chances for a wintry mix and snow showers on Wednesday into Thursday.
RELATED: How to sign up for severe weather alerts on the KARE 11 app
Text your weather-related photos or videos to 763-797-7215. While you're at it, save KARE 11 as a contact on your phone!
LATEST WEATHER-RELATED SCHOOL CLOSINGS
DOWNLOAD KARE 11 APP FOR IPHONE HERE
DOWNLOAD KARE 11 APP FOR ANDROID HERE
Download the free KARE 11+ app for Roku, Fire TV, Apple TV and other smart TV platforms to watch more from KARE 11 anytime! The KARE 11+ app includes live streams of all of KARE 11's newscasts. You'll also find on-demand replays of newscasts; the latest from KARE 11 Investigates, Breaking the News and the Land of 10,000 Stories; exclusive programs like Verify and HeartThreads; and Minnesota sports talk from our partners at Locked On Minnesota.
Watch the latest deep dives and explainers on weather and science in our YouTube playlist:"
kare11.com,Geminid meteor shower peaks this weekend: How to catch one of the year's best celestial events,https://www.kare11.com/article/weather/geminid-meteor-shower-2025-peaks-this-weekend-how-to-see-it-where-to-look/507-491c8e89-29bc-4bac-9575-f879bdc74a38,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video ATLANTA — Skywatchers are in for a treat this weekend as the Geminid meteor shower —one of the most beloved meteor displays of the year—reaches its peak. Derrick Pitts, chief astronomer at The Franklin Institute, says this year’s show could deliver more than 100 meteors an hour under the right conditions. “One of the ","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
ATLANTA — Skywatchers are in for a treat this weekend as the Geminid meteor shower —one of the most beloved meteor displays of the year—reaches its peak.
Derrick Pitts, chief astronomer at The Franklin Institute, says this year’s show could deliver more than 100 meteors an hour under the right conditions.
“One of the coolest things about this is it's one of the most prolific showers of the year,” Pitts said. “Observers under clear, dark skies might have the opportunity to see as many as 150 meteors per hour—far and away more than any other shower of the year.”
The Geminids will peak the night of Saturday, Dec. 13 into the early morning hours of Sunday, Dec. 14, though Pitts stresses that visibility improves as the night goes on.
“The later you go in the evening, the better your chances,” he said. That’s because the radiant—the point in the sky where the meteors appear to originate—continues to rise higher in the east as the night progresses.
But even early-night observers won’t miss out. “If you can't be up late, just head out once the sky gets dark and look toward the east. You're bound to see a few,” he said.
Unlike most meteor showers, which come from icy comets, the Geminids originate from an unusual source: the rocky asteroid 3200 Phaethon. Every December, Earth passes through a dense trail of dust and debris shed by the object over centuries.
“That dust has been distributed along its orbital path,” Pitts explained. “Every year the Earth passes through that path around the same time, and we see this meteor shower.”
This year’s moon will be about 30% full during the meteor shower's peak, which Pitts calls “manageable.”
“That means the skies won’t be as dark as they could be, but at least it’s only 30% and not 90% or 100%,” he said. While the moonlight may reduce the total meteors visible per hour, Pitts expects viewers will still see plenty—especially if they look away from the moonlit part of the sky.
As always, the darker the sky, the better the show.
“The best place to view any meteor shower is somewhere where the skies are clear and dark,” Pitts said. “The farther you get from bright city lights, the better your chances.”
A cloud-free sky is a must, but no special equipment is required.
For many astronomy enthusiasts, the Geminids are a highlight of the year thanks to their brightness and reliability.
“When people go outside to look at some astronomical phenomenon, they actually want to see something,” Pitts said. “A meteor shower provides that opportunity—objects falling into the Earth’s atmosphere, streaking through the sky, sometimes looking like they’re coming right at you.”
Occasionally, a particularly bright or long-lasting meteor—called a fireball—adds extra excitement. But there’s no way to predict when one might appear, which Pitts says only adds to the anticipation.
Not likely. Most Geminid meteors are tiny—often no bigger than grains of sand.
“They’re falling into the atmosphere about 40 miles up, and the intense heating and shock waves destroy them long before they reach the surface,” Pitts explained.
While microscopic dust from the shower does settle on Earth, a recognizable meteorite from the Geminids is extremely unlikely.
The Geminids are one of the most accessible celestial events of the year.
“All you need is a dark sky and your own eyes,” Pitts said. He suggests giving your eyes at least 30 to 40 minutes to adjust to the darkness.
He also recommends watching with others. “It’s always more fun with a group, and with more people looking in different directions, you increase your chances of spotting more meteors.”"
kare11.com,WEATHER: Frigid weekend wind chills,https://www.kare11.com/article/weather/latest-minnesota-weather/89-d44129df-c1cb-4874-9a11-9e5ae525daeb,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video MINNESOTA, USA — The Arctic cold is set to arrive this weekend. Even by January standards (note: it is December), this will be frigid, especially when factoring in the wind on Saturday. Air temperatures will have a tough time reaching zero on Saturday and the wind chill is forecast to be in the -20s and -30s all day. ","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
MINNESOTA, USA — The Arctic cold is set to arrive this weekend.
Even by January standards (note: it is December), this will be frigid, especially when factoring in the wind on Saturday. Air temperatures will have a tough time reaching zero on Saturday and the wind chill is forecast to be in the -20s and -30s all day.
Because of the unseasonably cold air, the KARE 11 Weather Team has issued a Weather Impact Alert for all of Saturday and the first half of Sunday.
While our temperatures may only warm a handful of degrees on Saturday, our wind chills will hover near -20° nearly all day long.
Our winds will settle down Sunday morning before shifting to the south later in the day, but our wind chills will continue to range from -25 to -15 degrees nearly all day long. On a side note, the record cold temperature at MSP for Sunday is -27. A bit of good news... we won't get that cold!
We'll be forced to brave the frigid wind chills this weekend, but a modest warming trend is set to take place towards the middle of next week taking wind chills in a significantly warmer direction.
That midweek warm up will include temperatures that take us above freezing and include overnight lows that are quite mild for this time of year. Most storm systems next week will run across southern Canada reducing our chances for any major snowfall; however, we are watching our chances for a wintry mix and snow showers on Wednesday into Thursday.
RELATED: How to sign up for severe weather alerts on the KARE 11 app
Text your weather-related photos or videos to 763-797-7215. While you're at it, save KARE 11 as a contact on your phone!
LATEST WEATHER-RELATED SCHOOL CLOSINGS
DOWNLOAD KARE 11 APP FOR IPHONE HERE
DOWNLOAD KARE 11 APP FOR ANDROID HERE
Download the free KARE 11+ app for Roku, Fire TV, Apple TV and other smart TV platforms to watch more from KARE 11 anytime! The KARE 11+ app includes live streams of all of KARE 11's newscasts. You'll also find on-demand replays of newscasts; the latest from KARE 11 Investigates, Breaking the News and the Land of 10,000 Stories; exclusive programs like Verify and HeartThreads; and Minnesota sports talk from our partners at Locked On Minnesota.
Watch the latest deep dives and explainers on weather and science in our YouTube playlist:"
kare11.com,KARE 11 Investigates: MN Governor appoints new fraud czar,https://www.kare11.com/video/news/investigations/kare-11-investigates-mn-governor-appoints-new-fraud-czar/89-940d4e58-f271-4210-929a-6880992c3452,,,"To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app. Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video Next up in 5 Example video title will go here for this video","To stream KARE 11 on your phone, you need the KARE 11 app.
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video
Next up in 5
Example video title will go here for this video"
